So here I am, at the soft opening of this new restaurant in town called District One.
I'm here with 6 friends, so I didn't actually order ALL this food.
Decor: Love this Asian fusion restaurant.
The decor is so cute.
Especialy love the wallpaper and the "let's nhau" quote (vietnamese for let's party/drink) in the corner of the room.
There's also a huge bar that greets you and FOURTEEN flat screen tv's all over the place.
It's totally set up for some good eating, drinking, and sport gatherings.
The CAFE SUA DA (Vietnamese iced coffee) was perfect.
I am a coffee lover, and I'm extra critical.
But they nailed the coffee here.
Strong and sweet.
Appetizers: the GARLIC AND SERRANO PEPPER WINGS are good.
Comes out hot, crispy, and moist on the inside.
The serrano pepper definitely gives it a kick.
And the side of pickled radish adds a nice touch too.
The SHAKEN BEEF SALAD comes out on a huge bed of lettuce and tomatoes.
The beef is sweet, salty, and savory at the same time.
The beef could be more tender, but flavor wise, it was exellent.
We also asked for a side of lemon, salt and pepper to dip the meat which really enhanced everything.
Entree: the STEAK AND EGG is where some of the asian fusion comes out.
It's not the traditional t-bone steak you might expect.
It's actually more like the shaken beef appetizer.
But the flavor is more sweet.
This beef actually is more tender though.
And the fried egg, which was over easy, was actually over easy!!
*clap clap.
The SLOW BRAISED PORK BELLY IN YOUNG COCONUT JUICE was a little on the smaller side for an entree.
Also, the flavor was not as intense as I would have anticipated.
It needed more bang, more salt.
The OX TAIL PHO came with two big pieces of tender ox tail.
It was so tasty and actually fell off the bone.
Curiously, the pho tasted like Pho So 1.
Which is also a restaurant in chinatown that does very well for itself.
Overall, this place has the potential to be great.
I can imagine coming here to watch the game and grabbing a few drinks after work.
The staff is young and friendly.
And occasionally, the chef comes out to see how everyone is doing.
That's so cool.
It definitely feels like a family friendly environment.
The waiters and waitresses come around and they always ask if everything is okay, and ready for refills.
Decor/Ambience: ***** Food: ****1/2  Service: ***** Drinks/Bar: TBD Overall: *****

All I have is say is "WOW!!
" This place is absolutely amazing.
From the service to the cute decor and..
The food!
Omg the food.
So good!
Was not expecting the different types of flavors and dishes that this place had to offer.
Definitely not your typical Vietnamese restaurant that you find in china town.
I want to say it's more of an Asain fusion with a primary focus on Vietnamese style cooking/flavors.
My group and I ended up ordering family style which I felt was the best way to try more of the dishes because the menu had so many options to offer!
Everything sounded so tasty!
There wasn't a single dish that we didn't enjoy, but I highly recommend the shaken beef salad, pork belly with boiled egg, beef tacos (my favorite!!
Not on the menu), steak and eggs and Ox tail pho.
Hands down best pho I've ever had.
I usually have to add hoisen sauce to enhance the flavor but this was perfect the way it came.
The food was so flavorful and the quality was perfect.
The steak was so tender, blew my mind away!
If you're around the area this is definitely a place to check out.
You won't be disappointed:) I know my friends and I will be returning a visit real soon

Best way to start the Chinese New Year w/ great comfort food .
I was craving a spicy bowl of pork soup.
Chef Khai recommend I try the lotus shrimp salad .
It's refreshing and tasty w fresh herbs .

This is the next to go to hotspot.
The owners of this restaurant are friendly.
Fast and convenient service.
The food is phenomenal!
See a lot of promising things for this Vietnamese fusion.

If you love asian food or seafood this is the place to go!
The Decor is sleek, the ambience is welcoming, the service is seriously one of the best, and the food is exquisite!
I am big on service and District One definitely has one of the best service I've had at a restaurant.
The servers are extremely knowledgable and always attentive.
Drinks are always refilled without even having to ask.
When you need someone to help you out they are always there to tend to your needs!
There is definitely no cutting corners on flavor in all the dishes.
Every dish I've tried has been extremely impeccable!
If you are into buying seafood by the pound this place is for you!
I recommend the Shrimp with house special sauce.
The shrimp are always cooked perfectly and the size of them are crazy!
Only the best!
I also would recommend the Vietnamese egg rolls.
Best in town!
This place seriously is a must go no questions asked!

It's a real no-brainer that this will be the best Asian restaurant in town for many years to come.
Cleanliness check, service check, decor check, food + drink check.
You have everything and anything that your Asian craving desire.
On top of that, you have the selection from the old Cravin Cajun menu!
Crawfish and shrimp bags!
I think that the Chicken Roti dish here should be their signature dish.
I've been looking for years to find the equivalent of http://www.yelp.com/biz/bale-valley-restaurant-canoga-park and finally DOKB delivered.
The game hen, so juicy, so crispy, so salty-sweet.
It's the ultimate indulgence.
Surprisingly it does not come with fish sauce dipping, so don't forget to ask for it.
It's a must!
It would be like eating egg rolls without the dipping sauce (which by the way this place makes a mean egg roll!!).
I can take my whole family here and every single person in the crowd would be pleased.
I love the simple yet expansive menu selection.
I appreciate not having to choose from 10 difference combination of Vietnamese rice dish when there's really only one.
I'm already craving my next meal here.....

First time here at district one and I'm glad we came.
Ask the Chef to do a tasting menu for you and you won't be disappointed.
A must try restaurant here in Vegas.

Our party tried three appetizers and three entrees.
We started with the Vietnamese Eggrolls, Fish Tacos, and Pork Belly Buns.
These were all great tasting and beautifully prepared.
The eggrolls were made with taro which gave it a unique taste.
The fish tacos were our favorite.
Although on the pricier side (approx.
$10 for three baby tacos), the fish was fresh and tasted awesome with all its taco components.
Pork belly was tender.
Highly recommend.
Entrees were Mi Sate, Oxtail Pho, and Steak & Eggs.
Mi Sate was OK. We all agreed it was our least favorite dish.
Very super thick, peanut flavored sauce-like broth with skinny egg noodles.
There is a small spicy kick, but I couldn't get over the peanut butter thickness.
Maybe it just had a bad night?
The real hero of the night was the Oxtail Pho.
Leave it to District One to bring this one all the way home.
Very aromatic, tender (and plentiful servings of) oxtail, a truly original tasting broth.
Steak & Eggs was a good decision too.
Steak was tender and expertly cooked, tomato rice was flavorful, overall good decision for anyone.
Impeccable guest service.
We were diligently waited on by an attentive team and the food came out in a timely manner.
Overall good food, good ambiance.
I will return with friends.
Next time I'd really like to try their crawfish, lobster pho, 5 spice roasted hen, clay pot pork belly, and ca phe sua da!
Awesome first impression!
See you again, District one!

Went here last night for birthday dinner with friends & it was amazing!
Super great & friendly service, nice atmosphere & delicious food.
We ordered a variety of appetizers & pho soups & it was all delicious.
Nicely flavored & seasoned dishes & plates.
Will return all the time & bring more friends to check it out!

Off the hook...rare beef to the bone finger licking good!!
:))  Enjoy all these foods we've tried too.
Checkout our yummy eats!

Good to have this restaurant nearby!
Mostly Vietnamese, with a twist of fusion.
We had Fish Taco, Steak & Egg, Mekong River Style Noodle Soup and everything was tasty!
The ambience was good too.

Four stars because...  Tamarind Wings were a bit bland.
You got the tang when you first bite into it, but after that, nothing special really.
The Crispy Noodle Nest was superb!
This place made it with the light brown sauce rather than the thick white one & didn't have as much seafood, but it was still excellent!
The beef sausage I believe wrapped in the betel leaves were soooo good!
Service was great & they're very clean, always cleans up the plates and trash that are sitting on the table.

New kids on the block have got it going in and doing it right!
Great menu Wings Great Pork Chops Tasty Ox Tails the BEST!

This is my favorite new restaurant.
There's a good variety on the menu and I can't wait to try every single dish!
Here are my recommended dishes: tamarind crab (the best crab ever, albeit a bit messy to eat), fish tacos (most reviews recommend this one), spring rolls, pork belly buns, and crispy birds nest.
Besides the good food, the service is superb.

Consider me a big fan!
I was perusing potential spots for dinner last night and then I saw My T's picture of the 5 spice game hen and it..waS...ON.
They bake the game hen and THEN deep fry it!
Why don't more spots bake and then fry things?
It tasted even better than it looked.
The side of tomato rice was really good too.
I almost never rave about eating bird but I will be having this again.
Another favorite was their shaken beef salad.
I was shaken up after my first freakin bite!
The beef was so juicy and so tender and only $12!
The hot grilled beef mixed with the cool lettuce, onion, tomato and spices made for one of the best salads I've had in recent memory.
The Mekong River noodle soup was just ok.
It looked great and was filled with lots of fixings like fish balls, pork tenderloin, quail eggs, veggies and shrimp but the pork based broth fell short for me.
I saw a lot of customers going for the bone marrow soup and holy shit what a spectacle that was.
HUGE bones!
Me would feel like caveman and raise bone like champion (grunt!).
Check out the pics of it.
But man oh man so much other stuff I want to try like the slow braised pork belly entree, crispy bird nest noodle and more shaken beef!
They're located in the old Cravin Cajun spot so it's great for groups.
I hope they get their liquor license soon.

I've been to District One twice in 1 week - that's how good it is.
See Marcus or Khai.
They'll make sure you get exactly what you want.
I ordered the pho with shrimp the first time I went, which was very good.
The 2nd time, I asked Marcus how to get more veggies in my pho, so he had me order the veggie pho with a side of shrimp.
Perfect!
Clean, reasonably priced, great music & they'll be receiving their liquor license soon.
I can't wait to go back!

Being Vietnamese myself, this is honestly my new favorite Vietnamese restaurant in Vegas.
It has a modern look, and nice modern menu to go along with it.
I went here with my wife, 1 year old, and mom.
The service for all of us was superb, even for my child.
We had the Pork Belly Buns, Ox Tail Pho, "Steak and Eggs", and the Slow Braised Pork.
The Ox Tail Pho here is amazing, definitely bang for your buck.
The meat on the tail is perfect, and the amount of noodles they give is the perfect amount.
All Vietnamese places in Vegas usually give a tiny amount.
The Pork Belly Buns were delicious.
The steak and eggs were perfectly made, the steaks were nicely marinated.
The Slow Braised Pork is nice and soft.
The sauce is perfect, and loved the way the egg was cooked.
We will definitely be back!

I had the Edamame Xo , it was yummy also tried the tamarind chicken wings and had pho.
It was all very tasty and the staff was very friendly.

Hue spicy soup was good.
Broth was flavorful but lacked some vital ingredients to be a true Bun Bo Hue noodle soup.
Steak and egg was delicious but the meat could use a bit more seasoning.
Overall a great start for a new restaurant with some minor tweaks to be a permanent staple within the ever changing Chinatown niche of Las Vegas.

Love this place!
Food is amazing.
Reminiscent of traditional Vietnamese cuisine, but with an added of a little something.
Just enough level of customer service where you can find someone if you need something, but private enough for a good date night.
Tonight my fiancé and I we're eating and he accidentally drop the nutcracker (for the crab legs) and immediately the owner (who I assume was the owner) came running to our table paper towel at hand to help clean up the phone.
Pretty awesome of you ask me!
A must try!

I am very close to 5 star here but can't do it.
I think it's because the pho and the bun Bo hue didn't quite blow me away.
I am at 4.5 stars though.
The place is immaculate clean and hipster inside.
Bar is a nice added touch and it's always busy.
So that's a great sign.
I would go back but would try some of the other menu items.
Service was 5 star.
Try it you won't be disappointed

Best new place in Vegas!!
A must to try and come back for more.
Super friendly and knowledgable staff.
Vee and Crystina are awesome!!
The food is outstanding!
The beef carpaccio was full of flavors I didn't think would taste a good as they did.
The braised pork belly will leave you filling full good size portions.
Worth the wait for this place.

Absolutely love this place!
The service was excellent and the food was delicious.
The hubby and I have been here a handful of times.
My favorite dishes would have to be the bun bo hue, pho ox tail, and shaken beef salad.
They are quite generous with the meat and the flavor is simply delish.
Hubby went on and on about how great the razor clams were.
We've also had their pork belly buns, crispy egg rolls, and garlic serano pepper wings.
All were extremely tasty.
I can honestly say that I've never been to a restaurant where I enjoyed every single item that we ordered ... until now.
:) Their bar is now open as well, and I have every intention of visiting it.

Came here two days in a row!
I have a soft spot for the pho with rib eye.
My goodness, melts in your mouth.
The cornish hen, the pork chop, everything I've had is spot on.
You can't go wrong here.
The servers are so nice, the prices are really low, I'm coming back.
Plus they have ice coffee...
I'm sold!

I was sad to learn that Cravin' Cajun had shut down and vowed to boycott District One right off the bat, like a pouty child actin a fool in my high chair.
Yet, after checking out the reviews and pictures on Yelp, I couldn't resist but to see what all the hubbub was about.
The dining set up is generally the same with minor accented tweaks here and there.
I was lured to this place initially because it didn't look like they took their "V" grade, turned it upside down and drew a line threw it for a fictitious "A" grade, unlike other Louisiana style seafood dumps.
Problem is, "the mob is fickled," and sad to say people sometimes are quick to jump on the bandwagon.
But enough about the old joint, it is obvious the new owners wanted to create their own niche.
Nevertheless, the hip doctor undoubtedly paid a visit to this place and modernized it with an industrial/urbanish twist with the decor, ambiance and music genre playlist.
Even much of the old staff is still here, although, I bird told me that the new owners include those from Pho Kim Long amongst other unknown benefactors.
I was hungry and was recommended to try the Mi Sate, as it looked quite filling considering that it is primarily peanut butter based.
It was sort of like Mi Quang, Kare Kare and sate stew had menage, producing a love child of savory goodness.
I added the grape leaf wrapped beef appetizers to switch things up as well.
I gotta say, the dishes are unique, bold and a nice eccentric version on Vietnamese cuisine that is practically absent through the entire city and I only hope for their success.
Best of all, Vy, who looks to be one of the head honcho-ess (?
), gave word that they will be offering Nikka, Hibiki and Yamazaki Japanese whiskey along with other unique refreshments.
It is now a must that I come back with like minds.

Damn!
This is my new favorite Pho restaurant in Vegas!
I got the Lobster pho and the Oxtail pho.
Both bangin as fuck and it didn't give me diarrhea so that's a Nguyen Nguyen Nguyen!

The server is very friendly, but the food is very bad...the crawfish that we ordered was small and spoiled, which was obviously not fresh...even the corn tasted funny...we also ordered pho and Mekong noodle.
The broth was tasteless, and bland.
Plus the noodle was soggy and broken...the decoration are great, but the food is very bad...we will not come back to this restaurant!

Talk about another hidden gem in Vegas.
I have been meaning too check this place out after hearing the buzz and looking at the pics it all looks really really good.
I really am digging the sign/logo of the restaurant.
If that doesn't make first impression from the moment you walk into the restaurant be surprise got upscale feeling too the place, even though bar area not that big really like the set up, and for any sports fan love the fact five widescreen all set up just like see at sports book bunch together.
The prices are supa reasonable up and down the whole menu.
The portion size for tapas style is really good size more so then other tapas style places been too in my experience.
Love the diversity of the menu also wide range from cornish hen, bone marrow soup, more tradition pho dishes, or beef salad.
Just talking about the entrees.
I no idea best place too start my District One Kitchen & Bar experience but the Hue Spicy Beef Noodle Soup was on my radar.
It the perfect soup too clear my running nose and sinus.
Boy did it not disappoint!
The broth had nice kick too it.
But not over the top that not enjoy the full body of the broth.
One of the best things about it is diversity of meats in it.
Counted four different ones in the bowl.
Really each time dug deep find another different treat in every scoop.
It nice hearty Pho dish.
Any sign of good Pho is no need too add anything more too the broth.
The appetizers was tough but went with the Beef Buns.
Talking about Buns in my last review Beef Buns brought back that same urge Bun crazy!
They do have peking duck buns too believe but went with the pork buns.
Talk about addicting get three per order but popping them down so easy wish order half dozen or hell could have done dozen.
Really that good!!
The pork is cooked nice crispy outside, moist inside, and glaze or sauce cooked in was fabulous could have ordered plate of pork!
The topping of think hoisen or oyster sauce combine with garnish of julienne carrots and couple other things.
The steam bun itself was the perfect Steam Bun with the perfect filling.
The service was awesome.
I torn between the tacos and beef buns waiter recommending the beef buns.
Save the tacos for next time.
No doubt be few more times because lot of good stuff on the menu.
Just happen ran into fellow yelpers Misti and Bobby.
They were kind enough ask if wanted too join them.
It was just me doing my yelp diligent checkout out all the ONO spots in Vegas.
Lol!!
Impromptu UYE with the one and only Misti Y and Bobby Y.
Thanks.
Trust me if not checked out District One you need too.
It really good food at reasonable price that we al can enjoy!

When you eat out enough you know when you have found a gem of a place to eat.
And my family have found one that we hate to let others know as we want it all to ourselves.
However since I've discover many a place from yelp I can let this one to the public too.
District 1 an Vietnamese inspired fusion restaurant located just North East on Jones and Spring mtn.
As soon as you enter the place you realize you will have a pleasant time.
Very welcoming atmosphere and not too loud on the decorations.
The wait staff are very pleasant and since it's not "grand opening" yet you are bound to be seated pretty soon.
PRO's:: Plenty of TV 's to watch anything.
Music not too loud which is always good  Fast food preparations  Fresh food and moderately priced Crazy Japanese Whisky selection ( a few that you will not find in the States.
) Draft beer selection is pretty impressive for a non gaming establishment  Liquor selection is great , high end alcoholic favorites that I will not able to afford lol and less expensive one for working class.
Lol.
They even have a Sake on tap " how ridiculous is that ".
I've spoken to the owner and requested they carry Carlsberg ( now am not a fool and know most times owners don't give a damn unless am spending crazy amounts of money here,...
But to my amazement the next time I came here.
Guess what.
my beer ) I felt the love and it's now my fav place to chill and try their tapas style menu and sip on chilled beer and stare at the expensive liquor.
Lol.
Am not much of a sea food person but my wife swears that their selection is fresh and loves the fish tacos / razor clams/ lobster pho/ and Dungeoneous crabs.
The list can go on but I'd bore everyone.
So go child this gem of a place and you will not be disappointed.

I have only been to District One twice.
The food is nothing special.
I have tried the Five spiced hen over tomato rice and pickled veggies.
I thought there was no point in adding the pickled veggies in the menu since you barely get anything.
I love that the tomato rice had a lot of flavor and also the hen.
Tomato rice and hen were perfect.
I have also tried their Oxtail Pho.
I honestly think there is nothing special about that.
The broth is just a regular Pho broth and the Oxtail seemed a little overcooked.
The menu is small compared to other pho places.
I think District one is a Viet Fusion restaurant.
They don't have everything a usual pho place would have.
They don't offer many rice dishes or the drink desserts.
So if you're looking for your typical Viet food, I wouldn't come here.
I would probably go to District One once in awhile for the Five Spiced Hen over Tomato Rice only.
The prices at District One are higher compared to any other pho places in Las Vegas.
The environment is more hip and clean compared to other pho places though.
It is very modern I would say.
There is a bar and seating is very nice.
The service was good.
I have only gone to District One once during lunch and early dinner (4AM).
There were only 3-4 other parties the times that I have gone there.

I definitely love the vibe going on at District One.
The quality of service their employees offer is top notch!
And the food, oh lawd I'm tellin' ya, it's to die for!
Their chef is definitely doing some magic in the kitchen.
District one is the type of place you can go to if you want to enjoy good wine and eat good food while enjoying the ambience without spending a ton of $$$.
Give this place a try, you know you want to!

We ordered the pho oxtail soup, beef lemon grass in betel leaves, fish tacos, beef carpaccio, pork belly buns and pork belly slow braised soup w poached eggs.
I enjoyed the pho oxtail soup and carpaccio.
Will come back to try more of their soups and entrees though.

Brand new restaurant (6 weeks they said)... Found it on Yelp because my cousin's gf wanted Asian for her bday dinner.
Hands down, best birthday dinner I've ever been to.
There were 6 of us in the group, and we decided to do everything family style.
We ordered 5 appetizers and 4 entrees.
The place was about 3/4 full, but our waters were always refilled by the time they hit half full.
The food all came out hot, and in a perfect progression just as we were finishing up what had been brought out first.
Everything was delicious, and I'll definitely be bringing other friends here when they come to town.

I got referred here by a friend who has been raving about it since it opened.
Decided to give it a try today and was very impressed.
I am no stranger to phò and this place has now taken the title of my favorite Vietnamese joint in town.
I got amazing, timely service and the food was to die for.
Ox tail phò was incredible and so were the tamarind chicken wings.
Atmosphere is nice too.
Great restaurant.
I can't wait to bring my friends and family back here!
Loved it.

Hands down my new favorite spot to bring friends and family .
The live  scallops n oysters were amazing !

Been wanting to check out this place for a couple of weeks and glad I did.
The scene is hip for a pho place and they don't offer the norm that you would see on the menu.
Music is good and decor is pretty modern.
We tried the Oxtail Pho, Steak and Eggs, and Braised Pork Belly.
I love oxtail with a passion so you really can't go wrong with me when oxtail is on the menu.
It fell off the bones and they were gracious with the amount of meat they had in the pho.
They put a little spin on the steak and eggs and added tomato rice which I also love (reminds me of the Asian cafe style food that you find in California if you know what I mean).
Steak was already cut up into small pieces and had an Asian flare to it.
The pork belly was pretty typical but also good.
I definitely want to go back to try some other things on the menu.
Also found out the owner is a friend of a friend so I definitely want them to do well.
My only complaint was my tiny coconut hole.
How do you scrape all that yummy goodness when you can barely fit the spoon in the hole.
But I got her done :)

They are located in a plaza on the Southeast corner of Jones and Desert Inn near Icy Juicy (situated in Cravin' Cajun's old spot).
The layout hasn't changed, however, it has new flair to suit District One.
I really like all the decals on the back wall!
I came with a few Yelpers (The Q's, David V., and Paolo) and it was a new experience for most of us.
We shared both of their chicken wings selections; Tamarind Wings ($6.95) and Garlic Serrano Pepper Wings ($6.95).
The wings were fried without a batter and tossed/dressed in light sauces of their respective flavors.
Both selections were bland, lacking a pinch of salt, however, the Garlic Serrano had great flavor potential.
Without a batter, the wings lacked any type of crunch or bite.
Additionally, the orders came with pickled vegetables (carrots and daikon) that were good!
We also tried the Vietnamese Beef Carpaccio ($10.95), served with lime juice, white onion, and peanuts.
The sauce (soy sauce and oil base) was very tasty and it made the beef taste amazing.
Everyone ordered their own dishes, like Fish Tacos ($8.95), Tomato Rice (side order; $1.50), and the District One Rice Combo Platter ($11.95).
The fish tacos were made with hamachi sashimi, avocado, cilantro, and cherry tomato in fried wonton "shells" and came in a set of three.
It was okay, but nothing special.
The tomato rice also lacked flavor and warranted a shrug.
For the Combo Platter, you can choose between chargrilled short ribs or pork chop and it comes with kimchee, pickled vegetables, lap xuong (Chinese sausage), and a fried egg.
The chargrilled short ribs were good and had a nice "char" flavor (no marinade).
I ordered the Slow Braised Pork Belly in Young Coconut Juice ($8.95), served with a soft boiled egg, and Jasmine rice.
This was really delicious!
The meat was soft and tender and the sauce created from the coconut juice and pork belly was fragrant.
I threw my whole bowl of rice into the stone pot to utilize every drop of the succulent sauce.
Even if there weren't any other successful dishes, I would come back just for pork belly coconut juice!
Everyone else seemed to really enjoy it as well.
Service was really nice!
We didn't realize that we had stayed almost an hour after their closing time, however, they were really cool about it.
I like the menu because of its focus on Vietnamese fusion and obviously, that makes it unique.
I don't eat Pho, but the MP Lobster Pho is definitely enticing!
Not sure how much the price fluctuates, but it was approximately $27 last week.
Anyway, I'm willing to give the other dishes a try and if anything, I'll always have the pork belly as a back-up plan!

Beef in betel leaves.
Oxtail Pho.
Pork belly in coconut juice.
These are some of our favorite items here.
Owned by the son of the owner of Pho So 1, we knew that we were in for some delicious Vietnamese food.
Our high expectations were met the moment we tried the food here.
With a small menu, they focused on high quality and innovative Vietnamese dishes.
The restaurant itself has a clean, modern and hip look.
Can't wait to come back and try other dishes!

The yellowtail mini tacos (3) are definitely something to write home about and they have a good mix of Pho and regular entrees.
Very cool vibe inside with bar, table, and booth options.
Reasonably priced at about $9/plate and a unique beer selection.
As a pescetarian, I was disappointed in the lack of veggie options but I should have called ahead to check the menu because I believe that they change it often.
There was a mishap with my Wonton Veggie order but the server and manager comped the soup and offered us a complimentary dessert.
----business done right

Had bomb ass Oxtail Pho..  Best Pho in town.
Atmosphere is trendy and hip.
Friendly staff and real authentic Asian food a twist..

My family checked this place out, the ambience was pretty good it has a modern, hip look to it.
This used to be craving Cajun.
I tried the braised pork and it was tender tasted really good.
I didnt get the chance to order their specials .
I will definitely come back and try out some of the other dishes on the menu.

Had the shrimp today AMAZING!
Again with the Ox Tail Pho!
Starting Friday they are open till 4am!

I had pork belly on my mind when I tried this place for lunch, but was a little disappointed to find out that they didn't have any since it was still cooking and it wouldn't be ready until dinner.
Since I had my heart set on pork belly, it took me a little bit to recoup and figure out what to order.
I finally decided on the combination rice plate with shortrib and my dining companion opted for the steak and eggs.
The food came out pretty quickly, although my dish came out a few minutes before my friends, which was a little annoying.
The lobster pho looked good as they were serving it to a neighboring table, so that definitely piqued my interest for my next interest.
I enjoyed my shortribs and everything I tried was solid, just nothing amazing.
Service was good but refills were a little hard to come by.
I especially enjoyed the kim chee which was on the spicy side.
That was my favorite thing about the meal.
I still couldn't get the pork belly out of my head, so I'll likely have to come back for that, but I've learned my lesson and will call in advance to make sure that they have it ready before coming in.

This is by far the most unique and amazing Vietnamese fusion.
Can't wait to return!
Bravo.

This is the best Vietnamese restaurant ever!!!
I love this place.
Christina and Kai are awesome.
I had a fish tacos.
It's soooooo good!!!
You have to order this one.
I had a fresh oysters.
It's really refreshing.
One of the best oyster I've ever had.
They have a full bar now.
They have so many drink to choose from.
They are open till 4am now on weekend.
This place is gonna be pack soon!!!
Come check it out!

Me and the bf have been wanting to try this place for a while now and take the fam here, so I thought why not try it out first before bringing the whole clan over.
The atmosphere is really great when you walk in.
Cute decoration and definitely brings a modern look to a Pho restaurant!
Big plus because it doesn't terribly smell like Pho and have you worrying about your clothes when you walk out!
They give you the option to either sit at a booth, open tables, bar or in a section somewhat closed off for tables.
The first time we came we asked for some recommendations and were encouraged to try out the lobster pho at $27.99 and yellowtail ahi tacos at $8.99, so we went ahead and did that.
The tacos were soooo good.
However, it was pricy for only only three small tacos.
So I guess it really depends on what you are looking for: quality vs. quantity.
The lobster pho was ok as far as taste (didn't wow me like I would expect) but the idea and look of the plate was cool.
as far as the service, our waiters were great and very informational on the menu.
I was a little distraught with.
who I think, was the owner or manager.
Both times I came to the restaurant, she spent more time trying to impress the "big buyers" and didn't stop to see how the other tables were doing even though those customers were right next to them.
So that docks my service review a little.
I also mentioned it to a friend of mine and she mentioned she noticed it the few times she went of the selective service.
So for my review the first time around, I give the restaurant a 3 for food and 4 for service!
My second time later that week I brought my family and ordered the oxtail soup and hue spicy beef noodle soup for me and the BF.
Defffff redeemed themselves this second time around.
I loved both soups and the oxtail was so soft it basically just came off the bone easily (I'm sorry no pictures for the second time around tho!).
The service was all around the same as the first - good waiters, manager tended or paid notice only to other higher paying customers.
But all in all, second time rating is a 5 for food and 4 for service!
Definitely coming back again and again...
But It won't be for the lobster pho!
Love this place!

This is the old Cravin Cajun and perhaps still has remnants of it on their menu.
The new twist is the Vietnamese offerings.
We tried two entrees the five spice game hen and the shaken beef/eggs.
My favorite by far was the five spice game hen, two large hen quarters that are fried to a crisp on the outside and moist/juicy on the inside.
The shaken beef was nothing too special, tasted like Maggi seasoning on beef that you would get at other Vietnamese restaurants.
The appetizers were a little underwhelming besides the lemongrass beef skewers which were tasty.
We tried the pork belly buns and the tamarind wings, but I would probably pass on them next time.
The tamarind wings were watery tasting on the inside and not really that flavorful.
The old cravin cajun had better wings...
The pork belly buns were just okay.
The one item that I will come back for is the Big Bone Marrow Soup...it seemed every table had one....we got there early so didn't realize what was popular until we saw all the other tables cutting away at their big bone.
Overall, will definitely be back to try their other offerings.
They offer a variety of pho style noodle soups including oxtail and lobster pho.

Tamarind wings, yum!
I had the pho bo vien.
My friend had the short rib combo.
Everything was good.
Would return, nice atmosphere and friendly staff.

YELP 365 CHALLENGE 2014-(89/365) "Cravin' Cajun Reincarnated"  A bunch of us stopped in as a plan B after we sadly found out that I-naba was closed for the evening.
Restaurants these days have the wierdest names!?!?
I kept calling this restaurant One Direction!?
After finding out the correct name, it still reminded me of The Hunger Games, not a restaurant!?!?
Oh well....  We shared a few apps and started out with the Tamarind Wings and the Garlic Serrano Pepper Wings which were both puny in portion and very underwhelming.
We also shared the Beef Carpaccio which was delicious and the star of the appetizers.
For my entree, I ordered the District One Combo Plate with The Kalbi short ribs.
I asked to substitute Vietnamese Red Rice with extra garlic.
This plate was good, but not great.
Nice taste and char on the short ribs, but unfortunately, the rice was red, but kinda bland and there was no extra garlic like I asked for.
there also was pieces of Chinese sausage and a little pile of kimchi on the plate as well but seemed like it didn't really flow with the rest of the components.
After getting a taste of Amelinda's Slow Braised Pork Belly in Coconut Water (SO FRICKIN' ONO!!!!!
) That would be THE dish I would return for.
If you have the chance, order this dish.
Don't ask questions, JUST DO IT!!!
ALOHA!!!!
Shaka Meter:  \uuu/  \uuu/  \uuu/  \uu  3.5   *Little more than A-Ok right now with wiggle room for improvement...

So far one of the best customer service I have had in a while.
Everyone is pretty friendly and helpful, they make sure you are comfortable.
The food is pretty good different compared to other places.
Highly recommended especially if you like seafood.
Everything you eat will be flavorful its like a party in your mouth.
The place is big so it is good for big parties.
Some of my favorites are the  Oyster  Pork belly bun  Steak and eggs  Oxtail pho  Slow braised pork belly in coconut juice Coconut mojito ( verry good!
) must try  Best of all the big bone soup this a must as well   The price is also decent considering how good the food is.
Typically don't write reviews  unless the service is really bad or if I had a really good experience.
With all that said Kudos to the staff for such wonderful customer service please do keep it up because for sure my friends and I will be a regular.
:)  I love that they are open till 4 am on the weekends.

The food was awesome.
The service was a little off, but not bad by any means.
I would recommend this location to others.

From phó to tacos to cajun style seafood theres something for everyones taste when you can't decide where to eat.
Had a great experience eating at this place.
It has  really cool design about it.
Real urban-ish.
Our waiter was good too!
Because it was our first time, he was showing us the popular dishes that other people ordered.
But since we already ordered ours we didnt want to over do it.
Next time we come here I'm defiantly going to try some of there other stuff!

"Come on guys" whines my Midwest poker bud as a bowl of soup, with a Flintstone size, sawed open beef bone is set before him; glistening, wobbly bits of bone marrow evident everywhere.
"I need some non Asian friends", almost pouting.
Then silence.
"Hey, let me try..." I start, only to be cut off.
"Get your own" the only reply.
Not your typical Vietnamese eatery, instead an updated approach fusing other Asian flavors and  using ingredients more common in the States.
Hawaii yeeps, think Pig and the Lady done right.
Oh and it's a gastropub.
Lobster pho.
Your typical pho dressed with a whole lobster (it's head sticking out of the bowl).
"Wash out" the head fat into the broth, some sriracha for heat and consume quickly.
The lobster, sweet and perfectly cooked when it first arrives, it rapidly overcooks in the hot broth.
Very complex.
The braised oxtail pho, with its almost gelatinous broth equally good.
Pass on the Vietnamese American crab boil.
Instead try the wok tossed Dungeness crab in tamarind sauce (messy, the sweetness contrast with the tangy tamarind), or the diver scallop sashimi topped with tobiko, Serrano pepper, tomato and onion, mint, and a  tangy citrus soy sauce.
Oceanic candy!
Into clams?
Steamed clams with basil and lemongrass, grilled clams or the stronger flavored razor clams with crushed peanuts and scallion oil, razor clam dressed with a soy truffle infusion topped with Serrano pepper slices, garlic flowers, and chives, with a side green papaya salad, or a spicy (similar to XO flavored), giant, wok cooked surf clam.
Not perfect; the clams border on being over cooked, the "Vietnamese beef carpaccio" cooked from sitting in the citrus soy too long, and the braised pork belly (similar to Japanese kakuni) using coconut water instead of sake, over braised and crumbling.
Casual vibe.
Off Strip, Asian service.
Large selection of reasonably priced beer.
Simply put, intriguing.

- very good and quick service - depending on what you order the portions can be a good size.
- ordered a few different items with my group and everything tasted very good.
- prices are fair

Oxtail pho!
Yum yum yum!
I kept seeing this place pop up on yelp so decided to give it a try.
Turns out, pho so 1's owner's son runs this place!
My family and I have been going to pho so 1 for years so when I found out, I was super excited.
My mom got to the restaurant first and she was waiting outside.
As soon as Khai saw her, he ran out and told her he'd get a table started while she waited for the rest of us to arrive.
What awesome service.
We felt like VIPs :P  Not your typical vietnamese pho place.
They have the common pho combos and also offer a variety of other fresh seafood items.
I got the oxtail pho.
It was ~$12, on the pricey side for pho... but totally worth it.
My bowl came out with 3 huge pieces of oxtail!
It also comes with a side of dipping sauce for the meat.
Mix them up and squeeze a little bit of lemon and its delicious!
My sister got Mi Sate.
It came out and looked delicious but it definitely was not.
It tasted like someone took half a jar of peanut butter and mixed it in with her soup.
Way too peanut-y and sweet.
Not a fan.
One other minor complaint I have about this place is that my very Vietnamese mother had a difficult time ordering the specific pho combo she wanted.
Their menu had the basics.
She typically gets pho chin tai nam... not on the menu.
Totally not a problem but when she tried to order, both my mother and the waitresses were confused.
Neither of them spoke Vietnamese.
I don't mind this at all but I know my mom wasn't too happy.
She'd be more comfortable with going to a solely Vietnamese speaking establishment so I probably wont be coming here with my family but I know for sure I will be back with some friends!
I really wanna try the Lobster Pho!!!!

I am absolutely in lust with this place!
I would give it 5-stars but they were all out of the first item I ordered and my second choice Item took 15 mins longer to come out than the rest of the tables order...
Although, I really enjoyed my food and service was awesome!!
I felt the food prices were on par with the food quality.
I decided to skip a cocktail because the prices seemed to be a little high for off the-strip.
I plan on going back soon because I enjoyed it so much!

The Oxtail Pho was wonderful!
At a reasonable price, the Oxtail Pho ($11.95) is LOADED with Oxtail bones in an oily, flavorful pho broth.
VERY GOOD!
Portion size was very fair as well!
And the meat was much more tender than most....this would be my favorite rendition to date!
I really wanted to try the Lobster Pho for around $27 (market price), but I am VERY happy I was able to try their Oxtail here!
Just gives me a reason to come back again :)  Service was quick and efficient, and the restaurant itself looked clean and inviting.
I will be back!

I've tried this place twice now hoping to find something I really like and tbh I don't find it to be anything special food wise.
I tried several items on their menu from the pho to the steak and eggs and the spring rolls but none of them really stood out.
In summary, experience is as cool and modern as they say, but the food is quite bland.
The Vietnamese coffee is a must try, and it's not a good place for a date being that the music can get super loud and intense.

Went with a large group for a birthday celebration.
Waitress and staff were attentive thorughout the night.
The restaurant decor was pleasing and soothing, it was lamost like a place you would visit if you were near the beach or coast.
The music ambience was modern and enjoyable.
The food menu had a few selections which was good, as too many options at times seems to make things complicated.
We ordered the Edemame for appetizers and were not too thrilled with the sauce.
The Belly Buns were delicious and so were the Beef Lemongrass Skewers (love that the lemongrass stick was encompassed by the beef in order to enhance the flavor).
As for their Pho dishes, I wish they had a lean meat option, I had the vegetable Pho and was happy the veggies were not "frozen" but freshly cut.
Overall experience even with clitches of large parties being able to split checks, it was worth coming here.
I recommend it.

I'm a little disappointed in this place considering all the hype I've heard about from others.
The experience that I had wasn't as close to what others may have gone through.
I came here with my boyfriend a little before noon way before the crowd even started to come in.
We had ordered the pho nam, braised pork belly and egg rolls.
The pho nam wasn't as great as expected.
When coming to a vietnamese restaurant, you'd think the flavor would have some tradition in there and not a bland flavor.
It seemed as though the broth was altered and not as delicious as you'd expect.
As I waited for my dish to arrive, the braised pork, we started to notice that the other customers who came way after we ordered started to get their dish before mine.
We asked the waiter/waitress where my order was as it had already been ten minutes after the pho came out.
They said there was a back order in the kitchen.
How the heck is there a back order when no one was there yet when we ordered?!
great cover up...but not really because we told them there was no one here when we ordered and they just looked stumped......... by the time it finally did arrive which was 20 minutes later.... the food looked like it had been sitting under the warmer the whole time and so did the taste of it.
For a place that received so many great reviews, highly disappointed.
Rather go to their parent company Pho So 1 which actually makes great food and has the food come out in time instead of making up excuses.
The Only Reason they are getting two stars is because they decided to give us 15% off our meal.
So for that they get an extra star.

Yummy Lobster Pho!
Well worth the drive.
Opens at Noon for lunch stays open till 4am!

Items Selected:  District One Kitchen & Bar Tamarind Chicken Wings Green Papaya Salad - Shrimp, Pork, Mint, Crushed Roasted Peanut Fish Tacos - Yellowtail, Avocado, Cilantro, Cherry Tomato Oxtail Pho The Big Bone Soup - Bone and Marrow Soup Slow Braised Pork Belly in Young Coconut Juice - Boiled Egg, Steamed Jasmine Rice 1lb Shrimp D1 Goodness, Medium Heat  Occupying the former home of Cravin' Cajun and serving up modern Vietnamese cuisine in a room one part hipster-industrial and one part sports bar it was with a group of five that I sat down at District One Kitchen & Bar just minutes after noon and focusing our order on variety the results proved 'variable' at best.
Clearly untrained and understaffed to handle a restaurant nearly 3/4 full by 12:30 it was with a trio of appetizers that our meal began and with beverage refills scarce as servers ran in circles perhaps it was fortuitous that none of the first round proved remotely spicy, the hamachi tacos bright and crisp at $3 each while dull, limp wings and the vinegar tinged salad proved entirely forgettable...and not particularly 'Vietnamese' at all.
Moving next to larger scale items, a duo of pho dishes would prove respectable if not particularly well presented; the supple oxtail imbuing long rice noodles with a meaty sapor while an enormous proximal femur laced its broth with fat to balance ample scallions, though heat remained mute even in the presence of sliced jalapenos.
Moving finally to the items that showed the kitchen's promise, suffice it to say that tender pork belly first braised then rendered soft in coconut milk proved by far the most complex option of the afternoon despite its unexpected sweetness and although a seemingly odd choice, the throwback 'get down n' dirty' shrimp finally delivered in the spice department, a pound of the snappy shell-ons again leaving my water-glass empty while wondering why we hadn't just gone to Crab Corner or Hot n' Juicy instead.

First time here.
Staff were very good and the food had lots flavor.
They have lots of tv's so we were able to watch the warriors game.
Would definitely come back to this place again!

Ordered the Specialty House Oysters which were pretty darn good.
Liked the citrus mixed with jalapeño (and I added a little Tabasco to each to give it an ever more vinegar-y kick).
It was a refreshing starter.
The Pork Belly Steamed buns were  tasty too.
Then I ordered the Pork Belly bowl, which was even better!
Best Pork Belly bowl hands down.
Served with a soft boiled egg in the broth, and just enough fat to melt in your mouth.
Yum!
My boyfriend ordered the Spicy Beef ramen, which he wasn't too impressed with and said it was way too spicy (and he likes spicy stuff).
However this isn't Monta, so he should've known better.
Overall, I thought the food was great!

HATE  Nothing.
DISLIKE  Service can be inconsistent depending on the server (some are inattentive while others are amazing).
Parking is very limited when whole commercial center is busy.
LIKE  The bar.
The modern decor.
One of the owners is very friendly and almost always available.
Menu doesn't just offer traditional Vietnamese offerings.
LOVE  Shaken beef salad.
Lobster pho.
Pork belly in coconut juice.
Steak and eggs.
Open late on the weekends.
Location pretty close to home.
Mekong River noodle soup.

Oooooh em gee!!!
Serrano wings, fish taco, braised pork belly, steak and egg, ribeye pho!!
It was amazing.. Everything melts in your mouth, I can't wait to come back!
However.... On our steak and egg the egg was more than overcooked, it could've been a frisbee!!
We requested a new one and OMG the same thing except the yolk was runny.
Serious?!
Hahaha I still can't figure out how amazing everything is and the egg is your failure...
Isn't that like the very first thing we all learn to cook?!
Lol.
Yum!

District One is a great addition to the plethora of Asian restaurants in Las Vegas.
The dishes are always fresh and the attention to detail is not what you expect in a restaurant the Chinatown district.

Went there last night; very convenient hours for those of us working late on the strip.
Setting was very clean, modern, and a good hang out spot.
Overall, the pho was the highlight and very delicious but other items weren't as flavorful and just missed the mark a little bit.
Here's a break down:  Fish taco: just ok, kind of fishy but it was a good concept.
Needed a flavorful relish or something else.
Spring rolls: crunchy and the garnish (perilla leaf, lettuce, mint) was amazingly fresh and abundant.
(I hate it when they only give you one perilla leaf or mint).
But the radish and carrot chips could've been marinated longer.
Manila clams: good and full of clammy goodness but again, not super flavorful.
Lacked salt and maybe more herbs.
Cornish game hens: well cooked, sauce was good, tomato rice could've had more flavorful.
Ribeye and flank pho: we got this just to see how their standard pho was and it was deeeelicious.
Beefy broth with a hint of sweetness.
As with everything else the garnishes were super fresh.
Tender meat, and a lot of it.
It definitely makes me want to try more of their pho.
Service:  I don't care about service that much especially because service at a lot of Asian spots on spring mountain is almost non-existent but this place was just odd.
Our wait staff were all young and very nice, but you could tell they lacked experience.
They sort of seemed to want to talk to each other and hang out with their friends who were sitting at another table.
One time we wanted another beer and tried to make eye contact with one of them and he just looked at us and waved awkwardly and turned around and sat down so he can talk to his friends some more...was hilarious and very weird.
And then 3 of them cleared our table but none of them offered to get us our check.
It's like if I opened a restaurant and hired my little brother and let him hire all his friends.
But all in all I love that we have a new late night pho place!

What a great first time experience.
Not your typical Chinatown restaurant.
Definitely more on the American modern style setting.
Kinda gives a feel for a wing house dining setting especially with all the large flat screen TVs located all around the restaurant.
Food was delicious.
Service was a little bit slow.
I felt like the server could have checked on us more often.
We order two appetizers: the fish tacos and pork belly buns.
Our tacos came out first, and the buns were still missing.
I had to ask the server if it was still coming out because she came to bring our entrees which was the pork chop combination rice plate and I had the shaken steak and egg with tomato rice.
So I was a little disappointed the belly buns came out last considering I ordered it as an appetizer.
Why is it even an appetizer of it's gonna come out AFTER my entree?
that why I'm giving it 4stars verses the 5.
Feel like the ball was dropped there.
Out of all the items we ordered... All though my shaken steak was great, it wasn't phenomenal.
It was a little too oily, although the flavor and taste was great.
Even though I will be back for it.
I think the one that really stuck out for me...
Flavor and taste wise was the fish tacos.
I must say it was to be one of the best fish tacos I've had.
It was all good but it was missing a bit of a wow factor for me to give it 5 stars.

This place was delicious.
We ordered king crab legs (D1 special), steamed clams with lemongrass basil sauce, scallops, fried rice, soft shell crab, short ribs, escargo and yellowtail tacos.
All were amazing and not salty like most Asian restaurants.
Cute place good staff!

I give it a 3 1/2 stars.
Maybe we just ordered wrong?
I was super hyped about District One and I even braved the cramped parking lot with our SUV just to try this place out.
But we came away just a bit underwhelmed.
No pop!
No wow!
Just a long, drawn out poot.
District One was hoppin', no joke there.
Sports on the TV, alcohol flowin' freely, and lots of heads on tables.
Very busy but luckily no wait when we visited.
The place is nice - modern, vibey, nice leather booths.
Shiny & new!
But the food...eh...was a bit lackluster.
I love me some Vietnamese food, and I love me some fusion.
But while that may be good and appreciated, I gotta sway back to the classics.
What good is fusion if you don't have the classic down?
Does one not learn how to walk first before trying a 360 kick flip?
Do you just approach Heidi Klum and MInka Kelly without mastering the art of taking the 'grenade'?
I think not.
Perhaps we should have ordered differently at District One, because what we had just didn't impress.
The menu looks delicious, rice dishes, soups, noodles, lots of Asian-inspired cuisine.
But that day I really wanted pho, and the wifey really wanted wings.
We started off with the Tamarind Wings.
Wow.
For $6, I'm sorry to say, I felt a bit ripped off.
These were 6 of the tiniest @$$ wings I've ever seen!
At $1 a piece damn were they small.
I mean, these wings were literally half the size of those you see at a place like Wing Stop.
Nearly no meat!
I guess I wouldn't have complained if they were some bomb-diggety wings...but...they were bland.
Oh, just bland.
There was a bit of sweetness to them but that was it.
One note.
No mixing of flavors, no sour, no heat, no crunch, no nothing.
I don't think they were properly seasoned as well because I didn't get much of a salty flavor either.
So plain.
This app definitely left the wifey and I hungry and hoping the main dish would fit the bill.
We both stayed basic and got the Pho Bo Vien, the beef pho.
It came to the table steaming hot, nice.
But again....what's with the portion?
The bowl was smaller than what we were used to at other Vietnamese places around town.
And for $8 each, we were a bit surprised.
At other decent places around town, for the same price I can get the special pho with more goodies, and in a bigger bowl.
We got our little plate of veggies as well for sharing.
This included some basil, bean sprouts, and fresh chilies.
The pho was pretty good, District One has some great broth.
Not overly salty, lots of complex flavor, good on the palette.
But boy did I crave for more noodles and more beef to sop this broth up.
The service for us was excellent.
Server was very attentive, wasn't hesitant to let us know if we had any questions on the menu to just ask.
Water was kept filled.
Overall it was an OK first visit to District One.
The wifey and I left hungry and were eating again less than two hours later.
I think place does warrant another visit, but maybe next time we'll go with the more popular dishes they serve.
I do fancy some Big Bone Soup or some Oxtail Pho!

District One - Vietnamese restaurant that is lounge and bar style.
Incredibly great service, average check ranging from $13-$15.
The food looks beautiful yet it's not the best, however the service is so nice and great that you can't even complain.
I would give this restaurant 4/5 because how great the service is.

I had been anxious to try this restaurant and am happy to report everything was outstanding.
We shared the scallop special of the day, beef carpaccio,  fried rice, soup and coconut ice cream.
The food was fresh, everything was balanced and tasty.
I can't wait to go back again!

Been here three times now and with each visit it gets better!
Lobster pho, beef carpaccio,  and oysters are must haves.
Service is great and the owner has come by the table to check on things each time we've been.
You'll be happy you stopped in.

Great service.
We had the razor clams.
Very fresh.
Pho is also very good.
The clams steamed with lemongrass & basil is also good.
Will return/ recommend this spot for sure.
The coconut ice cream is heaven, not too sweet or too creamy, served on half shell of the coconut so you can eat the young meat of the coconut.

I heard about this place mentioned a couple of times by not only my husband but a few of my foodie friends.
They told me that they had Oxtail Pho.
Man was I craving some Oxtail Pho during lent, I gave up noodles for Lent.
So, I finally had the chance to go and eat here with a few other peeps.
You know how it goes when there are more mouths to feed, more chances to try more food on the menu!
Yesssssss.
We were greeted by a few of the staff and they began by telling us all the awesome things they had on special that night.
In nice resturant lingo like "Chef has prepared...." Hey District One, nice touch on selling your menu.
District one is the old Cravin Cajun.
They fixed up the restaurant really nice.
Plenty of room if you have a big party.
Ono (delicious) to the grinds.
We had oysters, squid, chicken wings, papaya salad, quail...and that is just to name a few.
Of course, I still managed to get Oxtail Pho.
I still like another Pho place because their Pho broth is bomb, but the price they charge here would actually bring me back because of that.
It wasn't bad pho broth.
They actually gave HUGE oxtails.
By the way, if you still want your crawfish/crab/shrimp boil fix, you can still get it from District One.
Think I will have to try that they next time.
And the pork belly seems to be a hit so I better try that too.
My hubs liked it because they had a lot of his favorite Asian Whiskeys.
See Jesse N :)  Well they made me a fan.
As you can tell from my review I will be back.
I hope the hype stays good since I've seen this place change up a few times.
The variety they offer is awesome because everyone at the table should get different Asian fixes here...Yup, I said that.
Lil' asian me.

I wanted to give this place a five because i really liked the food but i felt the staff especially the manager was lacking.
My bf and i started with the razor calms at $14.95.
They were meaty but flavor was only ok. We also got the fish tacos which were pretty good.
It came with three wantons skins fried and shaped like taco shells and filled with yellow tail and added veg.
My bf got the oxtail pho.
I thought the broth was very flavorful and i enjoyed it alot.
The oxtail was fall off the bone tender.
I had the district one rice combo.
That included a large heap of white rice with a fried egg on top, pretty spicy kim chee, pickled veg, a small and thin but very tender and full of tasty goodness pork chop.
The seasoning on it was to die for.
Lastly it was suppose to have chinese sausage.
My food came out and i noticed the sausage i was really looking forward wasnt on my plate.
I told the waiter that explained yo mr thats what i ordered.
I told him that what i read on the menu was different so he went to check then to the kitchen then back to me.
He apologized and said the kitchen ran out of the sausage which i have never heard of a kitchen running out of a regular item on a menu that is in fact offered twice on the menu, even worse 168 supermarket is across the street and houses about 20 varities of chinese sausage.
I was quite disappointed and shocked that the kitchen didnt inform my waiter and i guess i wasnt suppose to notice.
To appease me they brought out free coconut ice cream that too was yummy.
Upon heading to the bathroom i saw food come out with the sausage.
I asked a waiter and they said i saw it correctly.
I called the manager over who was comfortably dressed in running pants and nikes and explained what happened.
She told me they did run out if the sausage and sent someone to the store after i was served and she felt the ice cream was a nice enough gift.
I told her it was but i wanted the sausage now that was suppose to be in my meal to begin with she said the she thought the ice cream would have taken care of that which i replied that i would pay for "her kind gift" if its a issue but i wanted my sausage.
I hate to say im coming back cause clearly customer service is lacking but i really enjoyed the food.
I should have known the manager was a joke when i saw her behind the bar getting her hair played with.

Had a late dinner here a coupla weeks ago: - Nice place with an eclectic menu, including even fish(?
) tacos.
- Rene(?
), my waitress, forgot to take my order or was busy, but she was really apologetic and made up for it.
- I enjoyed the oxtail pho.
Will definitely try this place again.

4 1/2 stars.
Came in on a Sunday evening.
Parking can be a challenge since there are many businesses located in this strip center.
Having visited Vietnam several times I'm familiar with this name and have stayed in the District Four located in Saigon.
The decor  is modern and the staff are younger and were all friendly.
I ordered the Chicken Pho the pork belly stew & jasmine rice.
The pho arrived first and broth was flavorful and chicken was lean.
Before finishing the pho the stew arrived and it looked great and was tender and delicious.
The sauce over the jasmine rice was a perfect combination and filling.
I inquired about dessert and my friendly waitress suggested the coconut ice cream which was served in a coconut shell and definitely succeeded in a happy ending.
They accept credit cards here and the prices are average.
I would certainly return here again.

Awesome pho ox tail soup, beef carpaccio, oysters were bomb with ponzu sauce and fucking caviar!
Ohh and coconut ice cream bomb.

This place is outstanding.
I'm visiting Vegas for a few days and decided to get away from the strip and try something new.
The place is a nice sports restaurant with excellent Asian food.
The fried rice was awesome along with the noodle soup.
I will be back the next time I'm in Vegas.

Love it!
The service is top notch, the restaurant is clean and bright, and the food is awesome.
One thing we were actually quite impressed by was the wine selection.
For a small Asian restaurant they have very good wines on their list at a very reasonable markup.
Their food is definitely a mix of items that are traditional and "new", but everything was prepared really well.
We opted for the special Kauai fried/grilled shrimp was were really tasty head on Santa Barbara prawn sized shrimp with some chili sprinkles.
I had the Hue noodle soup which had a very fragrant and spicy broth that hit the spot for me.
The beef salad was also really good.
I would say the only thing that was just ok were the oysters.
They weren't bad but there was nothing special about them at all.
Another restaurant added to my regular LV Chinatown list!
BTW, this plaza is FILLED with great places.
Another one of my favorite places is Shaanxi Gourmet a few doors down.
Q Bistro next door is pretty decent for big portions and food to eat with your beer!

This place is amazing!!!
I took my friends from out of town (LA) and they absolutely loved it.
A few days after our first visit, my friends requested to eat there once more before driving back to LA.
Our favorite menu items were the fish tacos (a perfect light crunchy shell with diced yellowtail inside), spicy beef noodle soup, their oysters are to die for( topped with caviar and a light ponzu sauce for dressing), the beef carpaccio has plentiful of flavors and melts in your mouth, their spring rolls and fried egg rolls are great, and their lobster pho is one of a kind.
I love it here and will be  coming back often.
I don't care about what they wear or what shoes they have on as long as the food is good and their service is friendly.
The staff is awesome and their manager crystina made sure our whole experience was perfect.
And it was!
Thank you crystina and district one for two great dinners during this past weekend!

This place is a solid 4.5 stars.
I round up for family owned places and down for chains...so they get 5!
The deduction of .5 stars would be for the lack of parking (which I know they can't help) and for a little pet peeve of mine, not listing the market prices.
If you are going to have things on the menu that are at market price, list the prices on the chalk board or have the servers mention them without having to be asked.
Now to the good stuff.
The oxtail pho was very good.
Large pieces of oxtail that were falling off the bone.
Also, the spicy beef soup was the kind of soup one would love to have on a cold winter night.
We wanted to try the big bone soup, but it was sold out.
The pork belly buns were good, but not great.

My BF and I were in Las Vegas for the weekend and decided to try this place out!
When we got to the restaurant, we were seated right away.
We looked over the menu and figured out what we wanted fairly quick.
We waited a little long to get our orders taken, which was odd, because it seemed like there were more workers than customers!
When we looked around seriously each table had a worker tending to them!!
One of the managers (I assume) went up to us to apologize about someone not helping us and got someone to take our orders right away.
I appreciated that.
The service was great after that!
On to the food, we had the pork belly buns and the fish tacos for our appetizers.
Both were delicious.
Just wished they were bigger or served more in a dish, but that's my inner fatty talking!
My boyfriend had one of their steak dishes which he said he enjoyed!
I had the slow braised pork belly in young coconut juice.
That dish was soooo good!
I love pork belly and that meat was so flavorful and melted in my mouth!!
It was on point!!!
I would definitely check this spot again and try their other dishes!

This place is a gem here in Vegas.
Best food and amazingly priced!
My nail guy, Harry (who works and owns the amazing Exquisite Nails) recommended this place because his friend, Nelson owns the joint.
Not only did Nelson take care of us but (again) the food and service was out of this world!

Incredible food to say the least.
This is my first time here and what makes it a home run for me is the atmosphere.
It's a different type of Vietnamese restaurants.

I love coming to d1 and eating fusion Vietnamese food and catching all the games football basketball on all the led tv screens.
They has a full bar and they usually have good live crawfish.
The owner Khai is a very cool guy and always introduces himself and make sure out experience is great!
Recommend this place for everyone!

Must try the razor clam with sauté green onion & peanut Must try the oxtails pho with extra side of meat balls or raw beef in hot broth.
i took a star back because the lemongrass clam was so salty and over cooked!!!
Service was very attentive and friendly, i had told many friends to come here for the Razor clams.
Don't bring your kids here though, the crowd is kinda punk ist with attitude, can be intimidating, but good food, i will over looked that

My new favorite place to go when me and my wife are craving pho & cornish hen.
Beautiful and modern decor and friendly & great staff.
Everything we ordered tasted great and looked delicious.
The portion for the Cornish hen is extremely generous.
A must try if you are a local like us or in town for vacation.

Cool looking space with that "industrial-hipster" look of exposed beams, metal, wood and a bar with wood pallets as a base.
Food was pretty tasty with the grilled squid being a must!
If the coconut ice cream is available then get it because it's a sweet, palate-cleansing mix of Filipino/Vietnamese type dessert.

The first place I want to go to when I'm craving some good pho.. Not even just any pho..  oxtail and lobster pho for very reasonable prices!
The oysters and pork belly are also amazing.
I also love how spacious and clean  the restaurant is..   District is now my favorite Vietnamese restaurant in Las Vegas!

Hipster Vietnamese fusion...
I like, I don't like it, then I like it again.
This is pretty much the feelings I had when visiting District one.
If a place projects itself as hipster, does that mean really they are no longer hipster?
I got some googling to do.
After a cool yelp night at the Mirage, we decided a late night snack was required and after seeing some nice reviews of District One and throwing it up on my bookmarked places we decided to venture here.
Thursday night, the car park is packed, I have no idea why, maybe something was going on in another business that I didn't see or hear, so make sure you be patient.
Walking into a near empty restaurant we were seated in a nice booth with a nice window view of some cool cars and neon lights.
The layout is actually quite nice, with a nice long bar at the rear of house and nice big Tv's.
The centre has 4 tabled chairs with a few booths closer to front of house.
This place is a hipster bar, it doesn't seem like a restaurant in china or Asian town.
We were greeted by an extremely nice sever who went through a bit of the menu and made a few recommendations.
All prices were very very reasonable, and dishes were quite large.
After looking at a few reviews on yelp we went with the Pork Belly Buns.
And I'd like to pass on they were great!!
As a main I grabbed the 5 Spice Hen.
Little disappointed in this dish, very very dry and a little bland.
I tried the Oxtail Soup which was a little difficult to eat but I will say to give it a try!
I like District One, I'm a little unsure how successful it has been, but I do believe the location might hurt them a little.
This market would serve better on the strip or in a Green Valley or even in the heart of Summerlin with less Asian restaurant competition.
Overall Price: $$ Drink: 3-5 Food: 3-5 Service: 4-5 Come back: Maybe

Love the interior of this place.
Place to just chill with your boyz.
I had the "District One Combo Platter" you can ask for both short rib n pork chop for extra $3.
Love the house kimchi that came with the platter as well as Chinese sausage.
My wife had the "Pho Ox Tail" Ox tail was just cook perfectly!
We ordered coconut ice cream in coconut as dessert.
We asked our server if we can have the coconut juice from the coconut n he bought us cup of coconut juice.
Thanx Aaron!

District One is amazing!
I've been twice and about 2 months between visits.
I was greeted with a "Welcome back!
" He said the whole restaurant remembered me because of all silliness my friends and I were having and the jokes I was making.
My friends and I were calling it PhOlympics and Phoci.
We're full of punny!
This unusually cool weather in late May and crazy allergies, Pho is what the doctor ordered.
On this visit we ordered Spring Rolls, the Vietnamese Beef Carpaccio, and a bowl of the Beef & Flank Pho.
I also ordered a Vietnamese Iced Coffee (which is a poor decision on a Wednesday night at 7 PM, I was so jacked) because when in Rome...  First out was the Beef Carpaccio, which was a little too salty for my taste, but it was tasty nonetheless.
A huge portion and I had a lot of fun eating it with chopsticks.
It was peanut, garlicky, citrusy goodness, just tone down the salt!
Next up was the Spring Rolls.
These were nothing special and were straight to the point.
Tasted fresh and the peanut-fish sauce was delicious and fresh.
Next up was the Beef & Flank Pho which was delicious.
The broth is perfection, top it with some sprouts, jalapeños, a squeeze of lime, and sprig of mint.
I also add a bit of Sriracha because I like the hot, hot, heat!
Seriously, savor the rich complexity of the broth.
At this point we were stuffed and happily fed.
We were thanked for dining there and happily on our way.
District One has a lot of seating, booths and long tables.
There's a bar and TVs everywhere.
Service is prompt and friendly.
Food is fresh and tasty.
They also have a bunch of fresh seafood that's delivered daily as well as a Lobster Pho that will happen at the next PhOlympics.
Solid Asian Fusion.
Definitely a fan!

Where to begin?
The vietnamese fusion idea was not appealing at first but then my drink came.
Vietnamese donkey drink (I think thats what it was called) was delicious and refreshing.
A lychee vodka mix it was by far my favorite drink.
Then the food came.
Their take on the papaya salad was incredible.
The oysters were also incredibly delectable.
The lobster pho was eaten by a friend and he said it was awesome.
A whole lobster was put into the pho making it a complete lobster dish.
I will be getting that next time.
All in all a great place with great service.

I took my family out for dinner and wanted to try something new.
This was an important dinner so it had to be somewhere good.
The glowing reviews brought us here.
We had to wait for a few minutes for a table which was bearable thanks to all their flat screen TV's with the OKC game on.
Pork Belly Buns: Braised pork belly with sauce, peanuts and cilantro.
This was tasty and fatty.
4/5  Soft Shell Crab: Big pieces of deep-fried soft shell crab with a dipping sauce.
4/5  Lobster Pho: Here's a dish you won't see at most Vietnamese restaurants in Vegas.
The broth was quite tasty.
They serve the whole lobster with head, claws and tail - the body and claws have been de-shelled so all you have to do is eat and enjoy.
Market price for when I went was $32.
4.5/5  Mi Sate: A big bowl of egg noodles and beef in peanut sauce.
It tastes like Filipino kare-kare but much watery and with noodles.
3.5/5  District One Rice Combo Platter: Short ribs (or you can get pork chop), kimchi, fried egg, Chinese sausage, and rice.
A big plate that will not leave you hungry.
The short ribs were flavorful and grilled.
4/5  The place seems like a good place to hang out at.
The bar looks promising and I was watching the bartender interact with people at the bar during commercials - the people at the bar seemed pleased.
They do serve alcohol, Vietnamese coffee, soda, etc.
Our server, Tien was alright.
He forgot to check on our drinks though.
A different server gave us our check and asked if we wanted refills - too late!
Tien came back to offer is refills - again, too late!
Service could definitely be improved.

Oh, wow.
Where do I start?
One of my friends brought me here.
It's in the old Ragin' Cajun, but it's nothing like that.
The menu is only what I can call "Asian Eclectic.
"  I had the whole Maine lobster pho, my friend had the razor clams in lemongrass and Thai basil.
The staff are great and the service is fantastic.
To quote a TV show I like, "You Gotta Eat Here.

This is one of the best restaurants I've been to.
The service was amazing!
TK was our server and he's absolutely awesome.
The food fantastic.
Their pork belly is one of my favorites.
They also have an awesome drink selection and really good whiskey.
I will definitive be a regular here

Bringing my friends in for game night and my lady for date night.
One stop dining experience.
Ask for chef Khai!

The appetizers were delicious, but that's about it.
The traditional dishes are subpar and overpriced.
My girlfriend and her family are Vietnamese and they were severely disappointed.
The appetizers alone cannot bring me back here.
However, the staff was nice and helpful and the decor was great.

I have been here a few times since it's close by to where I live.
Place is great nice atmosphere, clean, booths are huge they have a lot of TV's.
Had the garlic wings, tacos, steak and eggs, Cornish hen, rib eye pho, shaken beef salad, beef lemon grass (both styles), vegetarian egg rolls.
All were awesome.
Whenever I'm down to watch a game I will probably head there.

omg oxtail pho and lobster pho.
the pho broth is so clean tasting.
super friendly staff, casual late night eatery, good selection of alcohol.
if you want asian fusion food, this is the place.
excellent seafood choices.
if you want really good pho, this is the place.

Was introduced to this place by another friend visiting Las Vegas.
Great food, great drinks, great people!!!
The owner, servers and bartenders went out of their way to make us feel welcomed.
Added this to my must have's when in Vegas!!

We saw this place open up and bookmarked it immediately.
I'm always excited when a new Asian Cuisine place opens up in town!
We came here on Friday night to try out this new lovely place.
It wasn't busy and we were immediately seated.
The waitress was very attentive and took our orders quickly.
We ordered -   Fish Tacos Very good.
I wish they made a larger size so you can have it as an entree.
Who wants little bitty tacos?!?
Shaken Beef Salad Very good.
It was a good mix of sweet and spicy, very flavorful!
Garlic Serrano Wings - Not very spicy in our opinion, but still very good.
It had a very good flavor and the wings were cooked perfectly.
They were SUPER garlicy though.
So much you can taste that shit the next day.
The short rib combo plate - The ribs were very good, it's the only thing on the plate that has flavor besides the bowlful of garlic kimchi which I stayed away from.
Overall, the food, was very good.
They have a good alcohol selection and they have TV's up everywhere playing sports as well.
It's very clean and "hip" inside.
Definitely will try out again and try out some more food!

My BF and I were in Las Vegas for the weekend and decided to try this place out!
When we got to the restaurant, we were seated right away.
We looked over the menu and figured out what we wanted fairly quick.
We waited a little long to get our orders taken, which was odd, because it seemed like there were more workers than customers!
When we looked around seriously each table had a worker tending to them!!
One of the managers (I assume) went up to us to apologize about someone not helping us and got someone to take our orders right away.
I appreciated that.
The service was great after that!
On to the food, we had the pork belly buns and the fish tacos for our appetizers.
Both were delicious.
Just wished they were bigger or served more in a dish, but that's my inner fatty talking!
My boyfriend had one of their steak dishes which he said he enjoyed!
I had the slow braised pork belly in young coconut juice.
That dish was soooo good!
I love pork belly and that meat was so flavorful and melted in my mouth!!
It was on point!!!
I would definitely check this spot again and try their other dishes!

Shaken beef salad was amazing.
Shrimp skewers were delicious.
The atmosphere is relaxed and comfortable.
I am already planning our return meal.

Great service, so many things on the menu I would like to try.
Definitely will return on my next visit to Vegas.

The food was very yummy!!
However,  they do not accept debit/credit cards for payments under $15.
This goes against the Merchant Service Contract businesses sign to accept Visa/MasterCard.
One District does not post their policy.
One District just expects their customers to spend more money in their establishment.
This customer will not be spending any more money there.

Beef carpacio.... awesome.
Lobster pho...WOW.... Why only 3 stars....
The service ... horrible.
..sorry to say....
But I would definitely return to see what else that kitchen can produce

Holy my Moly.
This is another restaurant that gets me hard.
District One is a hidden gem.
I typically visit this establishment at least once for all my trips to vegas.
In fact, its the first place that I stop by when I drive to Vegas from Cali.
Food/Eating taking priority over Partying/Drinking...what is going on??
Yah its that guud!
Its known as the "new Go-To spot" for all people of Las Vegas.
I love PHO.
I REALLY DO LOVE PHO.
Simple, light, and delicious.
What originally caught my attention about this restaurant was that they had OXTAIL pho and BONE MARROW pho.
WHAT??
Yes...an oxtail where the meat falls right off the bone like butter and a delicious bone marrow with TONS and TONS of tendon.
The sight of the bone marrow and oxtail makes all foodies say the 3 magic letters: O, M, G.  The protein and meats were absolutely delicious.
The noodles were perfect and weren't too soggy and the basil and leaves were fresh to perfection.
(Fun Fact: Tendon is high in protein and low in fat)  Anywho...
When Im intoxicated beyond belief, or when I have any sort of alcohol in my system, the number 1 thing I crave is Soup and Noodles, in particular: PHO.
And when Im hungover as hell the next morning, my number 1 cure is PHO.
Being drunk in Las Vegas is fun, but being drunk w/o any delicious food to be consumed sucks.
I wish there was a 24/7 buffet.
Tacos El Gordos isn't as great as the original location in SD.
Steak and Eggs for some cheap price just doesn't cut it.
Earl of Sandwich gets boring.
And who wants to pay for overpriced room service??
PHO is my answer!
Another cool thing about this place is that its open till 3 AM.
And another cool thing about this location is that they serve lots and lots of craft Beers.
I had a Soba Ale created by Chef Morimoto...this is an ABSOLUTE MUST TRY!
If your drunk, or if your looking for a place with great Vietnamese food, come out to District One.
This place has a 4.5 star rating for a reason!
This is a must-visit for all foodies, especially those people (*cough asians) who love to take pictures of their own food.
This Bone Marrow is a must-see-in-person type of deal!
This place gets me hard, and I love everything about this restaurant, everything from the customer service, to meeting the managers, to the decor, and the plating.
HIGHLY RECOMMENDED!
UNTIL THEN!!
^-^

Good food & service.
We went for lunch ordering the pork buns, big bone marrow soup, steak & eggs sub the rice for garlic noodles, short ribs and rice combo.
Everything was yummy and the booth had plenty of space for our kids.
The customers continuously came in on a Sunday for lunch, I can imagine the dinner and late nights are packed.

I've had my fair share of pho in Las Vegas and hands down D1 makes the best bowl in town!
The broth isn't too oily (like most) and doesn't even need much sauce to amp the flavor.
Their appetizers never let me down..
The Vietnamese beef carpaccio is absolutely delicious!!
The restaurant is kept clean and the design is way beyond than your average Vietnamese joint.
Two thumbs up guys!

First of all the food was great we had the pork belly cooked in young coconut juice, crispy eggroll, combination plate w/short ribs and a fried egg on top of rice, raw oysters...prepared with a thin slice of jalapeno and caviar on top.
I did not like the flavor of the oysters even though they were prepared fresh.
But all our other dishes were delicious!
I would eat here again.
We also had a 2 yr old that they tolerated...which is always nice.

Best service in Chinatown.
The ingredients are of the highest quality and it comes out in the end product.
You have to try the lobster pho!

Interesting concept and a hidden gem in Las Vegas Chinatown.
Food: We weren't particularly too hungry this day so we ordered the Garlic Serrano Wings and Steak and Eggs.
I've been to a restaurant in the past where they served a dish similar to the steak and eggs so I was pretty excited about this dish.
Although all around it was good, it wasn't noteworthy.
The beef was a little bit on the tough side, but the flavor made up for that.
As for the rice that came alongside it, it definitely lacked some flavor.
The Garlic Serrano wings were also subpar.
These little wings didnt much meat clinging to the bones and the flavor was lacking as well.
The flavors sounded really good on paper, but to be honest I probably won't order this again.
I really wanted to try their famous Lobster Pho, but that will have to be ordered during my next visit.
Environment/ambiance: The restaurant itself is placed in the middle of what looks like an old school Asian plaza.
The decor is new and different, almost screaming that it's modern next to its neighbors.
On a sunny day you can't miss it---it shines in the sun.
Indoors it looks like it used to be a Boiling Crab.
They do a good job of representing their seafood theme.
It's cozy, a little musty, and the only thing missing is nearby seawater.
There's booths along the walls and a few tables for large groups in the middle.
Service: We came early during the lunch hour so we were seated right away.
We were also attended to right away by our server, but he didn't do much talking.
It would've been helpful if he explained the menu more (although I already had in mind what I wanted to order so no explanation needed).
Tips: This is definitely a place to eat, drink, watch a game, and hang out with friends.
It got pretty busy as it got later during the lunch rush.
They have different menu items than other restaurants so give it a try!

I liked the setup and people are friendly.
I wish they would have more seafood on stock but thats the price you pay for fresh ingredients.

Wanting a quick bite and decided to try something new.
Never been here before and was wow'd the first time walking in.
Never expect this contemporary décor when enjoying Asian/ Vietnamese food.
The wood all around the restaurant, multi leveled, and the beautiful 10-12 seat bar was warm and welcoming,  the aroma around the restaurant made us hungry, I was very excited to see what they had to offer.
After still talking about the décor, the server arrived promptly with menus and the specials of the day.
I was excited to try the entire menu, but settled on Pho Tai Nam.
Yes, it's about 98 degrees that day and I decide I wanted hot soup, don't judge!!
My friend ordered the Belly Buns.
Although, I did not get a chance to try her dish, she couldn't stop talking about how good it was.
My soup was awesome, what was great about the dish was the after part.
After having Pho, at some places, I become growingly thirsty, not so much with District One's pho.
It was full of flavor, right about of onions, and did not have whatever component that makes you thirsty.
Kuddos!!
I am excited to see this place make it big, very different concept.
The food was definitely fusion, I mean where can you get fish tacos and chicken wings at any other Vietnamese restaurants.
I love the marrying of different flavors, cultures, and ingredients;  the unpretentiousness, that is what food is all about.
Sure, this visit was brief, but I will definitely be back to try it out again and again.
Next time, I'll bring more reinforcements and will venture into the King Crab, Oysters, and the Down and Dirty options!
Can't wait!
Great job, great first impression!

Visit location with a party of 8 people.
Although there were tables available, the server (possibly the owner) said that we can't sit down as they are trying to balance the kitchen to ensure a bigger party before us could be properly served.
Yes, we get that but at least let us sit at the open table.
How can you deny your customers from sitting down when there were tables available?

This places really sucks the worst place I been to in Vegas.
They don't have half the food in their menu the food takes like 45 min to come out.
I don't know why the pho takes over 50 min to come out when you just add soup and make the noodle.
I would never come again

2 1/2 stars.
Came in on a Sunday evening and the place was so busy they were overwhelmed with crowds from the EDC - Electronic Daisy Carnival.
I'm not sure if management was unprepared but the service and quality was totally absent this second time dinning here.
I ordered the Mekong River Noodle soup, pork belly with coconut juice appetizer and Garlic noodles with shaken beef & egg.
I asked for the Noodle soup to be served first and balance of entrees to follow.
Unfortunately the waitress brought  Won ton noodle soup which was incorrect,  after telling a different waiter who apologized BC they were busy and redelivered the wonton noodle soup to the table next store.
When my correct soup arrived the noodles were flavorful and tasty and consisted of shrimp, quail eggs, sliced pork, chives and yummy broth.
The pork belly arrived secondly and it was tasty over the steam rice.
Lastly the garlic noodles were totally a miss - horribly greasy and overpriced at $13.95!
The waiter apologized for the poor service and offered me complimentary coconut ice cream dessert which took some time to receive since he never advised the waitress who only showed up once after bringing the wrong soup so she had to confirm the complimentary ice cream with the mangager!
I don't know if I'll return here again or if they're busy....I would avoid this place.
I Hope they get their service together and hope this was a fluke incident.

I'm a newly converted pho lover and have only enjoyed it when my friend's mom makes it from an oxtail soup base, so I can't say I have too much experience judging tastiness, but it was good enough for me lol.
From what I heard this place is owned or co-owned by my friend's cousin Nelson (Hi Nelson)..correct me if I'm wrong...which is a cool little addition to have found out.
The layout of the place reminds me of Boiling Crab back home, but the decor is very modern while the ambiance is relaxing/casual.
Food wise we tried the tacos which were a hit for everyone and the pork belly buns that were also bomb dot com.
My friend had the rice dish with pork belly and kind of wished that it was larger portion, but luckily his brother ordered pho so that compensated for him not being full.
Other than that we all ordered the oxtail pho and no one had any complaints about it not fulfilling their expectations.
Service was good in terms of refilling water and taking our orders, but it took a while for them to grab our bill so we had to walk up to the front cashier and wait for someone to notice us.
Other than that minor minor hindrance, the visit itself was worth the drive and this has become a new addition to my must-go's whenever I'm in town.

Went for the first time with my friend and daughter.
I liked the layout and modernness of the restaurant.
It was around lunch time when we stopped by, and even for edc weekend we were seated right away.
Our host/server were both very nice, they smiled and were very friendly and was able to suggest.
Went to wash my hands and it was interesting how there were sinks outside of the bathrooms.
For myself I just wanted to wash my hands and my daughter needed to use the restrooms.
Which were very clean and they didn't smell.
I had ordered the lobster pho, Spring rolls for my daughter.
And oysters to share with my friend.
He had ordered for himself the cube chopped beef with I believe garlic noodles and an egg on top.
Also an appetizer of fried chicken.
With that two Vietnamese coffees.
And for desert, coconut ice cream.
I think that's their only desert for now.
Lobster pho- the broth was good, but not great.
I felt like it lacked flavor.
The lobster was good too, I liked how they pick out the tail and claws for you.
The noodles taste like any other pho noodle, it was not too soggy.
However, that was it.
It was just a boring bowl of lobster pho.
Nothing wow.
Spring rolls- I enjoyed the crunch they added in the Spring roll.
But I wish there were more meat and noodles, the greens took up more then half of what was inside.
The sauce was ok. My daughter normally loves Spring rolls but this one she only ate half.
Beef w/ garlice noodles- noodles and beef were plain, barely much flavor.
I felt so bad for my friend that ordered this, since he was from east coast and I wanted to take him to a restaurant that he would love.
This dish didnt do it.
Oysters- yummy!
I really enjoyed this and the sauces and flavors they added to the oysters.
Would definitely order this again.
Pretty small ones though.
Coconut ice cream inside fresh real coconuts.
AMAZING.
Never had anything like this before!
coconuts ice cream with I think green jello on the bottom!
very creamy yumminess on top and nuts sprinkled as well.
I very much enjoined this desert and would come back for more.
It was not too sweet for me and my friend and I thought it was just enough sweetness.
Must try!
Disappointed in our main dishes, desert and oysters were great.
Of course I will come back because I want to try the rest of the menu.

Here for Happy Hour and their fish tacos are perfect.
The Oxtail fried rice was the best dish with their big chunks of oxtail.
$1 oysters.
Great rexaled vibe here

I really love that there is such a good atmosphere for friends and family's to enjoy good Vietnamese dishes.
The staff is always very attentive and so personable.
There's free Wifi for my kids to play on their iPads and have the best Oxtail Pho in town!
Broth is clear and tasty, amongst other plates on the menu, this is by far my go to order.
PLEASE expand another restaurant in Henderson!!!
I would drive here every week if I could !

they ran out of lobster pho (only reason to drop by).
their other pho was pretty msg'd out otherwise i guess if your hometown pho is already pretty dope, coming to vegas for viet is a step down.
i love the fact that they have a bar and it's a laidback interior.
otherwise, keep your viet urges till you leave sin city.
o yes, service and timeliness was almost worst than your average chinese hole-in-the-wall (too bad!

This place is LEGIT!!!
Servers are sweet.
Britney and Jonnazel are the sweetest and attentative!!!
Their fusion stuff is awesome.
Definitely a better variety compared to other places.

Came here with a friend and his sister (both locals) at their recommendation before heading to the airport to return home after a business trip.
Initially, I was a tad put off, for as we entered the establishment, the hostess, possibly the manager, completely ignored us for several minutes, favoring she was chatting with near the bar.
Eventually, she came over, seated us, and returned to her friend and a group of young gentleman sitting near the bar.
She never left that spot the rest of the time that we were there.
In my opinion, not the best managerial customer service.
But I digress...we arrived during Happy Hour, so I ordered two orders of the pork belly baos and one order of the tamarind chicken wings.
The service was very friendly and prompt.
The food was delicious!
Definitely, an excellent recommendation from my friend.
Definitely a locals place, but worth the drive if you are staying on the Strip.
Hopefully, the manager will learn to be a bit more attentive to all of her customers.

So disappointed  I drove from the southeast  part of Las Vegas  I got there and there was no bone marrow  soup.
Lesson learned so 2nd time I called told me in about 3 hours I got tired of the long time so I went somewhere else.
3rd time I called they said they had the soup so I drove there again.
Took them almost 45 minutes to prepare  it.
I am thinking this  would  be awesome.
Someone asked me if I wanted something to drink so I ordered  iced coffee.
When  he came back he said there was no cream so I said forget the coffee bring me my soup.
Finally it came it was a big bone soup, I was imagining  all the bone marrow  that I was getting I was so excited, I put my knife  inside the bone no marrow.
The other bone had a little  so I was ok until someone  ask me how the food was I told her about the situation  and she totally agreed  with me, she went to the kitchen  to talk to the chef and the answer was  it depends on the cut of the bone.
The name of the soup was big bone soup the description  said it has marrow on it.
But there was a tiny tiny marrow in this humongous bone.
I'm sorry but I'm not coming back.
By the way the service was good but I  drove there  twice for the bone  marrow soup.
For me it didn't  happen.

This place is always good!
The atmosphere and waiters/waitresses are some of the best.
Very professional and willing to accommodate.
One of my regular go to spots.
Must try: Hamachi tacos, pork belly in young coconut juice, & tomato rice!

They ran out of sake bomb which sucked because my friend and I really wanted one.
The pho was okay, but when I return I'm not going to be ordering pho.
The meat didn't cook and even when we asked for a hotter soup it still wasn't hot enough.
This place is not bad though I liked it & the atmosphere is nice.
I'll definitely be coming back to try the other food they have.

We love this place!
Happy hour twice a day and it's open late night!
We always sit at the bar because we love the bartenders!
Marcus and Tomas are awesome!
Ask Tomas for his famous lemongrass Siracha shot (sounds weird but they're soooo good).
Oysters are $1 each during happy hour too.. Great beer selection and amazing service!

I obviously don't "get this place" while I appreciate the decor the food leaves a ton to be desired.
Honestly I don't care if I am eating at a bus stop out of a paper hat if the food is good I will eat there every day.
This is literally the reason I hate trying new places.
When I arrived for a late lunch around 2pm the place was pretty busy.
I later put two and two together and figured the only people drinking a bottle of Veuve on a Monday afternoon would be the owner and his friends.
I ordered the rib eye pho, I may not be an expert but I have had pho at more than 20 places in Las Vegas and LA including staples like Pho Kim Long.
The pho at District One tasted like they took beef jerky from Wal-Mart and soaked it in hot water then threw in some "Fresh vegetables" also from Wal-Mart with maybe a dash of MSG but certainly not enough to add any flavor.
It was the worst Pho I have ever had.
Period.
I am writing this review absolutely starving because I took two bites and realized that even the entire bottle of cheap Hoisen sauce couldn't improve the flavor.
When I told the server it wasn't good and I just wanted a box and the check (In hindsight I don't even know why i would bother taking it to go.
) She didn't include any utensils or sauces so she must have imagined I would just throw it out.
She did give a half hearted apology and offer something different however I was so disgusted with the food so far I couldn't picture anything else on the menu edible.
Here is the worst part of the entire experience, I believe the level of ineptitude transcends anything thing the "chef" could ruin in the back of the house.
So I have already voiced my frustration with how awful the food is and I am actually offering to pay for it as opposed to just walking out and telling them where to stick it.
I put my debit card in the $8 check and she promptly returns to inform me there is a $15 minimum on CC transactions.
REALLY?
Do I have cash?
No...
I don't have cash.
I will go ahead and lay out the reasons why this pisses me off so much.
$15 dollar minimum!
Seriously?
This is illegal according to the Dodd-Frank Financial Reform Bill  (3) LIMITATION ON RESTRICTIONS ON SETTING TRANSACTION MINIMUMS OR MAXIMUMS.
(A) IN GENERAL.--A payment card network shall not, directly or through any agent, processor, or licensed member of the network, by contract, requirement, condition, penalty, or otherwise, inhibit the ability (i) of any person to set a minimum dollar value for the acceptance by that person of credit cards, to the extent that (I) such minimum dollar value does not differentiate between issuers or between payment card networks; and (II) such minimum dollar value does not exceed $10.00  2.
This is stupid, what do you think their average transaction for lunch is?
I'm going to go ahead and say their average check is just under $15.
You are only going to piss people off with these kinds of restrictions.
This may have flown 15 years ago but when the lady selling tamales out of her van started accepting credit cards on her iPhone it made this place look ridiculous.
When McDonald's started allowing credit card payments, they found that the average purchase size increased from $4.50 to $7.00 (source: NPR).
A broad study across multiple industries conducted by Dunn & Bradstreet found that purchase sizes were 12% to 18% more when paid for with credit card.
I am obviously already having a bad experience, why not just proactively handle the problem and when you drop off my check let me know "for next time"?
Would it really have been that hard for her do think autonomously without me needing to get more upset than I already was?
In conclusion: Don't go here.
It isn't worth the hassle or frustration, maybe the owner should put down his noontime Champaign and get in the kitchen.
I don't know what else can save this place from becoming yet another mediocre eatery in a city that deserves better.

After wasting my lunch break, I'm appalled to see the type of ratings they've managed to receive.
It really does give me an indication of what money can buy because quality certainly wasn't on their priority list when opening a restaurant.
I felt like pho-bomination they served me today was cooked in a toilet bowl after the violent passing of spring rolls and slim jim.
Mind you, I have eaten a fair share of Pho places throughout the WORLD, including in Vietnam.
I'd be ashamed to serve this lukewarm soaked garbage with chunks of shoe leather to my own enemies.
Will i go back?
I would rather fallete a vagabond with a mild case of gonorrhea then put myself through another wasted meal at District One.

We are ever disappointed here.
Everything on the menu is great.
Service is great.
Fantastic beer selection.

Came for dinner with the fiance.
I've been meaning to try this place as we can always use some variety into our late night eats rotation.
The waitress brought over a chalkboard menu with specials and explained each one.
We decided to get the oxtail fried rice off this menu.
I thought this was pretty yummy fried rice as the rice was flavored well and there was plenty of chunks of oxtail in the rice.
It had one egg on top, but it definitely needed more as after mixing it up into the rice, it sort've disappeared so perhaps consider getting a extra egg if you're a egg slut like me.
We also got the fried cornish hen with tomato rice.
I rarely ever see cornish hen on menus, which is unfortunate as it's a more juicy,personal sized chicken.
The fry on the bird was good, light crisp and it had a pleasant seasoning on it where I detected a hint of cinnamon that was lovely.
If you love natural style fried chicken (no heavy kfc style breading) then this might be your jam.
I was into this, it reminds me of Maxs Filipino style chicken that I grew up eating.
Our server was pretty good about checking in on us.
I like that this place is clean, modern  and has a young atmosphere with upbeat dance music.
It's refreshingly different from the minimal utilitarian nature of most Asian establishments.
The food is good so the fun vibe is just icing.
I will be back soon to try the pho!

